Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-174
Violations; penalty.

If any person shall violate any of the provisions of sections 23-164 to 23-174 for which penalty is not elsewhere provided therein, or if any person shall violate any of the provisions of any resolution adopted under the power and authority granted to county boards under section 23-174.01, 23-174.02, 23-174.03, or 23-174.10 or under sections 23-114, 23-172, and 23-173, such person shall be punished upon conviction in the same manner as for violation of section 23-114.05 in accordance with the penalties prescribed therein.

Laws 1941, c. 131, § 19, p. 516;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-159;

R.S.1943, § 23-174;

Laws 1961, c. 87, § 7, p. 303;

Laws 1967, c. 117, § 15, p. 377;

Laws 1969, c. 151, § 1, p. 710.